Mississippi, session 2026, SB2683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-42-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-42-19.  (1)  An agency contract must be in a record, signed by the parties. (2)  An agency contract must state or contain: (a)  The amount and method of calculating the consideration to be paid by the student-athlete for services to be provided by the athlete agent under the contract and any other consideration or anything of value that the athlete agent has received or will receive from any other source for entering into the contract or for providing the services; (b)  The name of any person not listed in the application for registration or renewal who will be compensated because the student-athlete signed the agency contract; (c)  A description of any expenses that the student-athlete agrees to reimburse; (d)  A description of the services to be provided to the student-athlete; (e)  The duration of the contract; and (f)  The date of execution. (3)  An agency contract shall not contain an exclusivity clause that extends beyond the student-athlete's period of eligibility. ( * * *34)  An agency contract must contain, in close proximity to the signature of the student-athlete, a conspicuous notice in boldface type in capital letters stating: WARNING TO STUDENT-ATHLETE IF YOU SIGN THIS CONTRACT: * * *(1){1}  YOU MAY LOSE YOUR ELIGIBILITY TO COMPETE AS A STUDENT-ATHLETE IN YOUR SPORT UNLESS THIS CONTRACT IS SERVING AS A PUBLICITY RIGHTS AGREEMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION 37-97-103; * * *(2){2}  BOTH YOU AND YOUR ATHLETE AGENT ARE REQUIRED TO TELL YOUR ATHLETIC DIRECTOR, IF YOU HAVE AN ATHLETIC DIRECTOR, WITHIN 72 HOURS AFTER ENTERING INTO AN AGENCY CONTRACT; AND * * *(3){3}  YOU MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT WITHIN 14 DAYS AFTER SIGNING IT.  CANCELLATION OF THE CONTRACT MAY NOT REINSTATE YOUR ELIGIBILITY. ( * * *45)  An agency contract that does not conform to this section is voidable by the student-athlete. ( * * *56)  The athlete agent shall give a copy of the signed agency contract to the student-athlete at the time of signing. (7)  Before execution, an agency contract that exceeds a value of Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) shall be made available for review by the educational institution's compliance department. SECTION 2. (1)  A student-athlete who is coerced, defrauded or misled into entering an agency contract has a right of action in a circuit court of competent jurisdiction.  In an action under this section, the court may award to the prevailing party damages, costs, reasonable attorney's fees and injunctive relief. (2)  A right of action under this section does not accrue until the student-athlete discovers or by the exercise of reasonable diligence would have discovered the act or omission that gives rise to the cause of action authorized in subsection (1) of this section. (3)  This chapter does not restrict rights, remedies or defenses of any person under law or equity. SECTION 3.  Section 73-42-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-42-23.  (1)  A student-athlete may cancel an agency contract by giving notice to the athlete agent of the cancellation within fourteen (14) days after the date the contract is signed. (2)  A student-athlete may not waive the right to cancel any agency contract. (3)  If a student-athlete cancels an agency contract, the student-athlete is not required to pay any consideration under the contract or to return any consideration received from the athlete agent to induce the student-athlete to enter into the contract. SECTION 4.  Section 2 of this act shall be codified within Chapter 42, Title 73, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.